Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.110

License—Display.

Every holder of a podiatric physician and surgeon license shall keep the license on exhibition in a conspicuous place in the holder's office or place of business.

[ 1990 c 147 s 12; 1973 c 77 s 9; 1957 c 52 s 15. Prior: 1917 c 38 s 2, part; RRS s 10075, part.]